Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-301.01
Electronic poll books; contents.

Beginning July 1, 2019, the electronic poll books for a precinct shall contain the list of registered voters and the sign-in register for the precinct combined in one database and shall include the registration information and the digital signatures for the registered voters of the precinct.

Laws 2018, LB1065, § 2.